Utah statutes.
78B-14-308 (Superseded 07/01/13).   Duty of attorney general.

(1)  If the attorney general determines that the support-enforcement agency is neglecting or refusing to provide services to an individual, the attorney general may order the agency to perform its duties under this chapter or may provide those services directly to the individual.

(2)  The attorney general may determine that a foreign country or political subdivision has established a reciprocal arrangement for child-support with this state and take appropriate action for notification of the determination.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

